District of Columbia statutes.
42-405

Notice of address and name change.

(a)

Any owner, as defined under § 47-802(5), of real property entitled to receive notices under Chapter 8 of Title 47 shall notify the Office of Tax and Revenue of a name change or address change within 30 days.

(b)

Any name change shall be evidenced by the recording of a confirmatory deed with the Recorder of Deeds and submission of supporting documents with and as required by the Recorder of Deeds relating to the applicable property.

(c)

Any address change shall be filed with the Office of Tax and Revenue on the form and in the manner as may be prescribed.

(d)

The Chief Financial Officer may issue rules to implement the provisions of this section.

Mar. 3, 1901, ch. 854, § 499d
as added Oct. 23, 1997, D.C. Law 12-34, § 2, 44 DCR 4827
Apr. 4, 2003, D.C. Law 14-282, § 7(a), 50 DCR 896
Dec. 4, 2014, D.C. Law 20-141, § 203, 61 DCR 7763
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, §§ 7103(c), 7104, 61 DCR 9990
D.C. Law 20-141 became effective on Dec. 4, 2014, but was repealed prior to its effective date by emergency D.C. Act 20-377, § 7114, eff. July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, by emergency D.C. Act 20-449, § 7104, eff. October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, by emergency D.C. Act 20-566, § 7104, eff. January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, and by D.C. Law (Act 20-424), § 7104, 61 DCR 9990.
Pursuant to the Office of the Chief Financial Officer’s “Notice of Public Interest” published in the April 18, 1997, issue of the District of Columbia Register ( 44 DCR 2345) the Office of Tax and Revenue assumed all of the duties and functions previously performed by the Department of Finance and Revenue, as set forth in Commissioner’s Order 69-96, dated March 7, 1969. This action was made effective January 22, 1997, nunc pro tunc.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7103(c) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7103(c) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 202 of the Residential Real Property Equity and Transparency Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-409, Aug. 1, 2014, 61 DCR 8281).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7113(c) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 202 of the Residential Real Property Equity and Transparency Emergency Amendment Act of 2014, (D.C. Act 20-342, May 28, 2014, 61 DCR 5691).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 8(a) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-510, October 23, 2002, 49 DCR 10247).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 8(a) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-456, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8107).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 8(a) of Tax Clarity and Recorder of Deeds Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-381, June 6, 2002, 49 DCR 5674).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 8(a) of the Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Temporary Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-228, Mar. 25, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 2741).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 8(a) of the Tax Clarity and Recorder of Deeds Temporary Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-191, Oct. 5, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 9549).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155 rewrote the section.
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-141, repealed before its effective date, would have rewritten the section.
D.C. Law 14-282 added subsec. (b-1); and in subsec. (c), substituted “Office of Tax and Revenue” for “Department of Finance and Revenue”.
1981 Ed., § 45-801.4.
This section is referenced in § 42-3131.06.